Hawaii statutes.
[§42F-107] Grants; release by the
governor. If a grant awarded by the legislature pursuant to this chapter
is not allocated or released by the governor within ninety days of the
effective date of the legislation awarding the grant, the governor shall notify,
in the manner prescribed in section 1-28.5, the recipient of the unreleased
grant on the status of whether the grant is still pending or will not be
released. The governor shall provide the notice once every quarterly allotment
period (as the periods are defined in section 37-32), beginning on the
ninety-first day after the effective date of the legislation awarding the grant
and until a final determination is made on the status of the grant. [L 2005, c
195, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next